Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.120

Federal programs—Rules—Statutes to be construed to meet federal law.

In furtherance of the policy of this state to cooperate with the federal government in the public health programs, the department of health shall adopt such rules and regulations as may become necessary to entitle this state to participate in federal funds unless the same be expressly prohibited by law. Any section or provision of the public health laws of this state which may be susceptible to more than one construction shall be interpreted in favor of the construction most likely to satisfy federal laws entitling this state to receive federal funds for the various programs of public health.

[ 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 264.]